Hawaii, session 2025, HB1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-627, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-627  Salary ratings of entering or reentering teachers; [Credit] credit for military service.  (a)  Any teacher with more than one year of teaching experience, and so accredited by the department, entering or reentering the service of the department shall have the teacher's salary rating determined by the personnel executive of the department, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, so that the salary rating shall be equal to the salary ratings held by incumbent teachers in the department with the identical number of years of experience.  The department shall recognize prior teaching experience, whether in the State or otherwise, at an equivalent rate to incumbent teachers in the department.  The department shall not limit the number of years of prior teaching experience that will be recognized under this paragraph. (b)  Any teacher who served on active duty with the armed forces of the United States shall be given credit by the department for the teacher's military service in the determination of the teacher's salary, the teacher's eligibility for leaves of absence, and for all other purposes of seniority.  Both reentering and entering teachers shall have each year of their military service or six months thereof credited as a year of teaching experience; provided that no more than four years of credit for military service shall be allowed. Evidence of military service shall be by certificate." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________